Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Enforcement.

Sec. 08.54.710.
Discipline of guides and transporters.

The board may impose a disciplinary sanction in a timely manner under (c) of this section if the board finds that a licensee

is convicted of a violation of any state or federal statute or regulation relating to hunting or to provision of big game hunting services or transportation services;

has failed to file records or reports required under this chapter;

has negligently misrepresented or omitted a material fact on an application for any class of guide license or a transporter license; or

has breached a contract to provide big game hunting services or transportation services to a client.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 49 SLA 2008.]

The board may impose the following disciplinary sanctions, singly or in combination:

permanently revoke a license;

suspend a license for a specified period;

censure or reprimand a licensee;

impose limitations or conditions on the professional practice of a licensee;

impose requirements for remedial professional education to correct deficiencies in the education, training, and skill of the licensee;

impose probation requiring a licensee to report regularly to the board on matters related to the grounds for probation;

impose a civil fine not to exceed $5,000.

The board shall permanently revoke a transporter license or any class of guide license if the board finds after a hearing that the license was obtained through fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation.

The board shall suspend or permanently revoke a transporter license or any class of guide license without a hearing if the court orders the board to suspend or permanently revoke the license as a penalty for conviction of an unlawful act. If the board suspends or permanently revokes a license under this subsection, the board may not also impose an administrative disciplinary sanction of suspension or permanent revocation of the same license for the same offense for which the court ordered the suspension or permanent revocation under AS

08.54.720

.

A certified copy of a judgment of conviction of a licensee for an offense is conclusive evidence of the commission of that offense in a disciplinary proceeding instituted against the licensee under this section based on that conviction, regardless of whether the conviction resulted from a plea of nolo contendere or the conviction is under appeal, unless the conviction is overturned on appeal.

A person whose license is suspended or revoked under this section may not engage in the provision of big game hunting services or transportation services during the period of license suspension or revocation.

If the board revokes a license under this section, the person whose license has been revoked shall immediately surrender the license to the department.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 49 SLA 2008.]

The board may suspend or permanently revoke a transporter license or any class of guide license if the board finds after a hearing that the licensee engaged in conduct involving unprofessionalism, moral turpitude, or gross immorality.

The board shall revoke the master guide-outfitter license of a person

whose right to obtain or exercise the privileges granted by a hunting, guiding, outfitting, or transportation services license is suspended or revoked in another state or in Canada; or

who is convicted of a violation of any state or federal law or regulation related to hunting or the provision of big game hunting or transportation services for which

the person is imprisoned for more than one day; or

an unsuspended fine of more than $1,500 is imposed.

The board may issue a registered guide-outfitter license to a person whose master guide-outfitter license is revoked under (k) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 163 SLA 2004; am §§ 18 — 24 ch 84 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 4 ch 49 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 2012; am § 5 ch 26 SLA 2019; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in the second sentence of former subsection (i), the revisor substituted “conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “before the board”
in order to reconcile sec. 15, ch. 163, SLA 2004 and sec. 24, ch. 84, SLA 2005 and to correct a manifest error in sec. 24, ch. 84, SLA 2005.

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of boards generally, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For professional ethics standards for guides, see 12 AAC 75, art. 3.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective September 14, 2019, added (k) and (

l

).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 14, 2021, in (k)(2), added “for which” at the end of the introductory language, added (k)(2)(A) and (B).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 19, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to subsection (k) retroactive to September 14, 2019.

Sec. 08.54.720.
Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for a

person who is licensed under this chapter to knowingly fail to promptly report, unless a reasonable means of communication is not reasonably available, to the Department of Public Safety, and in no event later than 20 days, a violation of a state or federal wildlife or game, guiding, or transportation services statute or regulation that the person reasonably believes was committed by a client or an employee of the person;

person who is licensed under this chapter to intentionally obstruct or hinder or attempt to obstruct or hinder lawful hunting engaged in by a person who is not a client of the person;

class-A assistant guide or an assistant guide to knowingly guide a big game hunt except while employed and supervised by a registered guide-outfitter;

person who holds any class of guide license or transporter license to knowingly enter or remain on private, state, or federal land without prior authorization during the course of providing big game hunting services or transportation services;

registered guide-outfitter to knowingly engage in providing big game hunting services outside of

a game management unit for which the registered guide-outfitter is certified; or

a use area for which the registered guide-outfitter is registered under AS

08.54.750

unless the registration requirement for the area has been suspended by the Department of Fish and Game;

person to knowingly guide without having a current registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide license and a valid Alaska hunting license in actual possession;

registered guide-outfitter to knowingly fail to comply with AS

08.54.610(e)

;

person who is licensed under this chapter to knowingly

commit or aid in the commission of a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or a state or federal wildlife or game statute or regulation; or

permit the commission of a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or a state or federal wildlife or game statute or regulation that the person knows or reasonably believes is being or will be committed without

attempting to prevent it, short of using force; and

reporting the violation;

person without a current registered guide-outfitter license to knowingly guide, advertise as a registered guide-outfitter, or represent to be a registered guide-outfitter, except as provided by AS

08.54.635

;

person without a current master guide-outfitter license to knowingly advertise as, or represent to be, a master guide-outfitter;

person without a current registered guide-outfitter license to knowingly outfit a big game hunt, provide outfitting services, advertise as an outfitter of big game hunts, or represent to be an outfitter of big game hunts;

person to knowingly provide transportation services to big game hunters without holding a current registered guide-outfitter license or transporter license;

person without a current transporter license to knowingly advertise as, or represent to be, a transporter;

class-A assistant guide or an assistant guide to knowingly contract to guide or outfit a hunt;

person licensed under this chapter to knowingly violate a state statute or regulation prohibiting waste of a wild food animal or hunting on the same day airborne;

person to knowingly provide big game hunting services or transportation services during the period for which the person’s license to provide that service is suspended or revoked;

registered guide-outfitter, except in the defense of life or property, to knowingly personally take

big game while accompanying a client in the field; or

a species of big game if the registered guide-outfitter is under contract with a client to provide a guided hunt for that species of big game and the client is in the field;

person who is licensed as a registered guide-outfitter, a class-A assistant guide, or an assistant guide, except in the defense of life or property, to knowingly personally take big game while a client of the registered guide-outfitter by whom the person is employed is in the field unless the person is not participating in, supporting, or otherwise assisting in providing big game hunting services to a client of the registered guide-outfitter by whom the person is employed; or

person who is licensed as a transporter, or who provides transportation services under a transporter license, to knowingly accompany or remain in the field with a big game hunter who is a client of the person except as necessary to perform the specific duties of embarking or disembarking big game hunters, their equipment, or big game animals harvested by hunters; this paragraph does not apply to a person who holds both a transporter license and a registered guide-outfitter license issued under this chapter when the person has a contract to provide guiding services for the client.

In addition to a disciplinary sanction imposed under AS

08.54.710

, a person who commits an offense set out in (a)(1) — (7), (17), (18), or (19) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000 or by imprisonment up to one year, or both.

In addition to a disciplinary sanction imposed under AS

08.54.710

, a person who commits an offense set out in (a)(8) — (14) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $30,000 or by imprisonment up to one year, or both.

In addition to a disciplinary sanction imposed under AS

08.54.710

, a person who commits an offense set out in (a)(15) of this section is guilty,

for a first offense, of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $30,000 or by imprisonment up to one year, or both;

for a second or subsequent offense, of a class C felony.

In addition to a disciplinary sanction imposed under AS

08.54.710

, a person who violates (a)(16) of this section is guilty of a class C felony.

In addition to the penalties set out in (b) — (e) of this section and a disciplinary sanction imposed under AS

08.54.710

,

the court may order the board to suspend the guide license or transporter license of a person who commits a misdemeanor offense set out in (a)(1), (3) — (5), (7), (8), (17), (18), or (19) of this section for a specified period of not more than three years;

the court shall order the board to suspend the guide license or transporter license of a person who commits a misdemeanor offense set out in (a)(2) or (9) — (14) of this section for a specified period of not less than one year and not more than five years;

the court shall order the board to suspend the guide license or transporter license for a specified period of not less than three years, or to permanently revoke the guide license or transporter license, of a person who commits an offense set out in (a)(15) or (16) of this section; and

all guns, fishing tackle, boats, aircraft, automobiles, or other vehicles, camping gear, and other equipment and paraphernalia used in, or in aid of, a violation of (a) of this section may be seized by persons authorized to enforce this chapter and may be forfeited to the state as provided under AS

16.05.195

.

Upon conviction of a person for committing an offense set out in (a) of this section, the execution of sentence may not be suspended and probation may not be granted except on the condition that the minimum term of imprisonment is served. Imposition of sentence may not be suspended.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 61 SLA 1997; am §§ 25, 26 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 73 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For penalties for felonies, see AS

12.55.035

and AS

12.55.125

.

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 18, 2014, in (a)(9), added “, except as provided by AS

08.54.635

” at the end.

Sec. 08.54.730.
Injunction against unlawful action.

When, in the judgment of the board, a person has engaged in an act in violation of AS

08.54.620(b)

,

08.54.630(b)

,

08.54.650(b)

,

08.54.710(g)

, or

08.54.720(a)

or the regulations adopted under these statutes, the board may apply to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the action. Upon a showing by the board that the person is engaging in the act, the court shall grant injunctive relief or other appropriate order without bond.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 27 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.54.740.
Responsibility of guide or transporter for violations.

A registered guide-outfitter who contracts to guide or outfit a big game hunt is equally responsible under AS

08.54.710

for a violation of a state or federal wildlife or game or guiding statute or regulation committed by a person while the person provides guide services for the guide-outfitter under AS

08.54.635

or during the course of the person’s employment for the registered guide-outfitter.

A transporter who provides transportation services is equally responsible under AS

08.54.710

for a violation of a state or federal wildlife or game, guiding, or transportation services statute or regulation committed by a person while in the course of the person’s employment for the transporter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 28 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 18, 2014, in (a), substituted “the person provides guide services for the guide-outfitter under AS

08.54.635

or during the course” for “in the course”.

Sec. 08.54.750.
Use area registration.

At least 30 days before conducting big game hunting services within a guide use area, a registered guide-outfitter shall inform the department, in person or by registered mail on a registration form provided by the department, that the guide-outfitter will be conducting big game hunting services in the use area. A registered guide-outfitter may not withdraw or amend a guide use area registration during the calendar year in which the registration was submitted to the department.

A registered guide-outfitter may not register for, or conduct big game hunting services in,

more than three guide use areas during a calendar year; or

a guide use area that is outside of a game management unit for which the registered guide-outfitter is certified under AS

08.54.600

.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, a registered guide-outfitter may register to conduct big game hunting services within a guide use area at any time before beginning operations in the guide use area and may conduct big game hunting services in a guide use area, or for a big game species in a guide use area, that is not one of the three guide use areas for which the registered guide-outfitter has registered under (b) of this section if the Department of Fish and Game has determined by regulation that it is in the public interest to suspend the registration requirements for that guide use area or for all guide use areas in a game management unit or game management subunit for a big game species within those guide use areas.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a registered guide-outfitter who is registered in three guide use areas may also register for and conduct big game hunting services in a portion of one additional guide use area on federal land adjacent to a guide use area in which the registered guide-outfitter is already registered if the board finds that the portion of the adjacent guide use area for which the registered guide-outfitter is seeking to be registered would otherwise remain unused by a registered guide-outfitter because the boundaries of guide use areas do not coincide with boundaries of federal big game guide concession or permit areas.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a registered guide-outfitter who is registered in three guide use areas may also register for and conduct big game hunting services for wolf, black bear, brown bear, or grizzly bear in guide use areas within a game management unit or portion of a game management unit where the Board of Game has identified predation by wolf, black bear, brown bear, or grizzly bear as a cause of the depletion of a big game prey population or a reduction of the productivity of a big game prey population that is the basis for the establishment of an intensive management program in the game management unit or portion of the game management unit or for the declaration of the biological emergency in the game management unit or portion of the game management unit. A registered guide-outfitter may only conduct hunts in a guide use area under this subsection for the big game species identified by the Board of Game as the cause of the depletion or reduction of productivity of a big game prey population.

At least 60 days before providing transportation services to, from, or in an area as may be determined by the board, a transporter shall inform the department, in person or by registered mail on a registration form provided by the department, that the transporter will be providing transportation services to, from, or in the use area. The board may establish transporter use areas and adopt regulations to implement this subsection as the board considers necessary.

In this section, “guide use area” means a geographic area of the state identified as a guide-outfitter use area by the former Big Game Commercial Services Board established under former AS

08.54.300

and described on a set of maps titled Guide-Outfitter Use Area Maps, dated June 22, 1994, as amended by the board as the board considers necessary.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 1997; am §§ 29, 30 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1997. Subsection (g) was enacted as (d) and relettered as (e) in 1997 and as (g) in 2010.
Subsections (e) and (f) were enacted as (f) and (g) and relettered in 2010.

Cross references. —

For limitation on certification for game management units, see AS

08.54.605(c)

.

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 08.54.760.
Hunt records; confidentiality of hunt records and activity reports.

The department shall collect and maintain hunt records provided by a registered guide-outfitter. A registered guide-outfitter shall submit to the department a hunt record for each contracted hunt within 60 days after the completion of the hunt. A hunt record must include a list of all big game hunters who used the guiding or outfitting services of the registered guide-outfitter, the number of each big game species taken, and other information required by the board. The department shall provide forms for reporting hunt records.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, hunt records received under this section and activity reports received under AS

08.54.650

are confidential and not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

. Aggregated data compiled from hunt records and activity reports may be included in reports by the department. The department shall make hunt records and activity reports available

if requested, to state agencies, federal law enforcement agencies, and other law enforcement agencies; and

to a municipality that levies a tax on those activities, if the

information concerns hunts or activities occurring within the four calendar years preceding the date of the request; and

municipality

requests the records for the purpose of verifying taxes payable; and

agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the records.

Forms, records, and reports required under this chapter may be distributed, received, and stored electronically.

The department may charge a municipality a fee, set by the department under AS

37.10.050

, to provide a record under (b)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 31, 32 ch 84 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 77 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125.

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 8, 2018, rewrote (b); added (d).

Sec. 08.54.770.
License and examination fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for each of the following:

registered guide-outfitter license;

class-A assistant guide license;

assistant guide license;

transporter license;

retired status license;

license application fee.

The license fee for the registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide license is in addition to the fee required for a hunting license issued by the Department of Fish and Game under AS

16.05.340

.

An applicant for a qualifying examination for a registered guide-outfitter license shall pay a fee established by regulations adopted under AS

08.01.065

.

The fee for the transporter license must be equal to the fee for the registered guide-outfitter license.

The amount of the license fee for a nonresident shall be two times the amount of the license fee for a resident.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 33 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 7 ch 73 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.54.785.
Chapter not applicable.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a person providing, for compensation or with the intent to receive compensation, only accommodations to a big game hunter in the field at

a permanent lodge, house, or cabin on private land owned by the person; or

a state or federal cabin on state or federal land.

History.

(§ 2 ch 49 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.54.790.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“any class of guide license” does not include a retired status license issued under AS

08.54.608

;

“big game” means brown bear, grizzly bear, caribou, moose, black bear, bison, Sitka blacktail deer, elk, mountain goat, musk ox, and mountain or Dall sheep; “big game” includes wolf and wolverine when taken under hunting regulations;

“big game hunting service” means a service for which the provider of the service must obtain a registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide license; “big game hunting service” includes guiding services and outfitting services;

“board” means the Big Game Commercial Services Board;

“compensation” means payment for services including wages or other remuneration but not including reimbursement for actual expenses incurred;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“field” means an area outside of established year-round dwellings, businesses, or other developments associated with a city, town, or village; “field” does not include permanent hotels or roadhouses on the state road system or state or federally maintained airports;

“game management unit” means one of the 26 geographic areas defined by the Board of Game for game management purposes;

“guide” means to provide, for compensation or with the intent or with an agreement to receive compensation, services, equipment, or facilities to a big game hunter in the field by a person who accompanies or is present with the big game hunter in the field either personally or through an assistant; in this paragraph, “services” includes

contracting to guide or outfit big game hunts;

stalking, pursuing, tracking, killing, or attempting to kill big game;

packing, preparing, salvaging, or caring for meat, except that which is required to properly and safely load the meat on the mode of transportation being used by a transporter;

field preparation of trophies, including skinning and caping;

selling, leasing, or renting goods when the transaction occurs in the field;

using guiding or outfitting equipment, including spotting scopes and firearms, for the benefit of a hunter; and

providing camping or hunting equipment or supplies that are already located in the field;

“licensee” means a person to whom a license, other than a retired status license, has been issued under this chapter;

“outfit” means to provide, for compensation or with the intent to receive compensation, services, supplies, or facilities, excluding the provision of accommodations by a person described in AS

08.54.785

, to a big game hunter in the field, by a person who neither accompanies nor is present with the big game hunter in the field either personally or by an assistant;

“transportation services” means the carriage for compensation of big game hunters, their equipment, or big game animals harvested by hunters to, from, or in the field; “transportation services” does not include the carriage by aircraft of big game hunters, their equipment, or big game animals harvested by hunters

on nonstop flights between airports listed in the Alaska supplement to the Airmen’s Guide published by the Federal Aviation Administration; or

by an air taxi operator or air carrier for which the carriage of big game hunters, their equipment, or big game animals harvested by hunters is only an incidental portion of its business; in this subparagraph, “incidental” means transportation provided to a big game hunter by an air taxi operator or air carrier who does not

charge more than the usual tariff or charter rate for the carriage of big game hunters, their equipment, or big game animals harvested by hunters; or

advertise transportation services or big game hunting services to the public; in this sub-subparagraph, “advertise” means soliciting big game hunters to be customers of an air taxi operator or air carrier for the purpose of providing air transportation to, from, or in the field through the use of print or electronic media, including advertising at trade shows, or the use of hunt broker services or other promotional services.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 34 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 73 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2012 the paragraphs were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order of the definitions.

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.